Hawaii statutes.
§836-4 Exemption from arrest and service of
process. If a person comes into this State in obedience to a summons
directing the person to attend and testify in this State the person shall not
while in this State pursuant to such summons be subject to arrest or the
service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose
before the person's entrance into this State under the summons.

If a person passes through this State while
going to another state in obedience to a summons to attend and testify in that
state or while returning therefrom, the person shall not while so passing
through this State be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or
criminal, in connection with matters which arose before the person's entrance
into this State under the summons. [L 1971, c 116, §4; HRS §719-4; ren L 1972,
c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next